Wisconsin, session 2025, SB490.
do enact as follows:SB490,11Section 1. 19.36 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB490,2,11219.36 (12) Information relating to certain employees. Unless access is 3specifically authorized or required by statute, an authority may not provide access 4to a record prepared or provided by an employer performing work on a project to 5which s. 66.0903, 103.49, or 103.50 applies, or on which the employer is otherwise 6required to pay prevailing wages, if that record contains the name or other 7personally identifiable information relating to an employee of that employer, unless 8the employee authorizes the authority to provide access to that information. In this 9subsection, “personally identifiable information” does not include an employee’s 10work classification, hours of work, or wage or benefit payments received for work on 11such a project.SB490,212Section 2. 66.0129 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB490,3,21366.0129 (5) Bids for construction. The nonprofit corporation shall let all 14contracts exceeding $1,000 for the construction, maintenance or repair of hospital 15facilities to the lowest responsible bidder after advertising for bids by the 1publication of a class 2 notice under ch. 985. Section Sections 66.0901 applies and 266.0903 apply to bids and contracts under this subsection.SB490,33Section 3. 66.0903 (1) (a), (am), (b), (cm), (dr), (em), (hm) and (im) of the 4statutes are created to read:SB490,3,13566.0903 (1) (a) “Area” means the county in which a proposed project of public 6works that is subject to this section is located or, if the department determines that 7there is insufficient wage data in that county, “area” means those counties that are 8contiguous to that county or, if the department determines that there is insufficient 9wage data in those counties, “area” means those counties that are contiguous to 10those counties or, if the department determines that there is insufficient wage data 11in those counties, “area” means the entire state or, if the department is requested to 12review a determination under sub. (3) (br), “area” means the city, village, or town in 13which a proposed project of public works that is subject to this section is located.SB490,3,1414(am) “Bona fide economic benefit” has the meaning given in s. 103.49 (1) (am).SB490,3,1515(b) “Department” means the department of workforce development.SB490,3,1616(cm) “Insufficient wage data” has the meaning given in s. 103.49 (1) (bg).SB490,4,217(dr) “Minor service or maintenance work” means a project of public works 18that is limited to minor crack filling, chip or slurry sealing, or other minor 19pavement patching, not including overlays, that has a projected life span of no 20longer than 5 years or that is performed for a town and is not funded under s. 86.31, 21regardless of projected life span; the depositing of gravel on an existing gravel road 22applied solely to maintain the road; road shoulder maintenance; cleaning of 23drainage or sewer ditches or structures; or any other limited, minor work on public 1facilities or equipment that is routinely performed to prevent breakdown or 2deterioration.SB490,4,43(em) “Multiple-trade project of public works” has the meaning given in s. 4103.49 (1) (br).SB490,4,65(hm) “Single-trade project of public works” has the meaning given in s. 103.49 6(1) (em).SB490,4,87(im) “Supply and installation contract” has the meaning given in s. 103.49 (1) 8(fm).SB490,49Section 4. 66.0903 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB490,4,111066.0903 (1) (c) “Hourly basic rate of pay” has the meaning given in s. 16.856 11103.49 (1) (b), 2015 stats.SB490,512Section 5. 66.0903 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB490,4,141366.0903 (1) (f) “Prevailing hours of labor” has the meaning given in s. 16.856 14103.49 (1) (e), 2015 stats. (c).SB490,615Section 6. 66.0903 (1) (g) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB490,4,171666.0903 (1) (g) “Prevailing wage rate” has the meaning given in s. 103.49 (1) 17(d).SB490,718Section 7. 66.0903 (1) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:SB490,4,201966.0903 (1) (j) “Truck driver” includes an owner-operator of a truck has the 20meaning given in s. 103.49 (1) (g).SB490,821Section 8. 66.0903 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB490,5,132266.0903 (1m) (b) The legislature finds that the enactment of ordinances or 23other enactments by local governmental units requiring laborers, workers, 1mechanics, and truck drivers employed on projects of public works or on publicly 2funded private construction projects to be paid the prevailing wage rate and to be 3paid at least 1.5 times their hourly basic rate of pay for hours worked in excess of the 4prevailing hours of labor would be logically inconsistent with, would defeat the 5purpose of, and would go against the repeals spirit of this section and the repeal of 6s. 66.0904, 2009 stats., and s. 66.0903 (2) to (12), 2013 stats. Therefore, this section 7shall be construed as an enactment of statewide concern for the purposes of 8facilitating broader participation with respect to bidding on projects of public 9works, ensuring that wages accurately reflect market conditions, providing local 10governments with the flexibility to reduce costs on capital projects, and reducing 11spending at all levels of government in this state purpose of providing uniform 12prevailing wage rate and prevailing hours of labor requirements throughout the 13state.SB490,914Section 9. 66.0903 (2) to (12) of the statutes are created to read:SB490,5,171566.0903 (2) Applicability. Subject to sub. (5), this section applies to any 16project of public works erected, constructed, repaired, remodeled, or demolished for 17a local governmental unit, including all of the following:SB490,5,1818(a) A highway, street, bridge, building, or other infrastructure project.SB490,5,2219(b) A project erected, constructed, repaired, remodeled, or demolished by one 20local governmental unit for another local governmental unit under a contract under 21s. 66.0301 (2), 83.03, 83.035, or 86.31 (2) (b) or under any other statute specifically 22authorizing cooperation between local governmental units.SB490,6,323(c) A project in which the completed facility is leased, purchased, lease 1purchased, or otherwise acquired by, or dedicated to, a local governmental unit in 2lieu of the local governmental unit contracting for the erection, construction, repair, 3remodeling, or demolition of the facility.SB490,6,74(d) A road, street, bridge, sanitary sewer, or water main project in which the 5completed road, street, bridge, sanitary sewer, or water main is acquired by, or 6dedicated to, a local governmental unit, including under s. 236.13 (2), for ownership 7or maintenance by the local governmental unit.SB490,6,198(3) Prevailing wage rates and hours of labor. (am) A local governmental 9unit, before making a contract by direct negotiation or soliciting bids on a contract 10for the erection, construction, remodeling, repairing, or demolition of any project of 11public works, shall apply to the department to determine the prevailing wage rate 12for each trade or occupation required in the work contemplated. The department 13shall conduct investigations and hold public hearings as necessary to define the 14trades or occupations that are commonly employed on projects of public works that 15are subject to this section and to inform itself of the prevailing wage rates in all 16areas of the state for those trades or occupations, in order to determine the 17prevailing wage rate for each trade or occupation. The department shall issue its 18determination within 30 days after receiving the request and shall file the 19determination with the requesting local governmental unit.SB490,7,320(ar) The department shall, by January 1 of each year, compile the prevailing 21wage rates for each trade or occupation in each area. The compilation shall, in 22addition to the current prevailing wage rates, include future prevailing wage rates 23when those prevailing wage rates can be determined for any trade or occupation in 1any area and shall specify the effective date of those future prevailing wage rates. 2If a project of public works extends into more than one area, the department shall 3determine only one standard of prevailing wage rates for the entire project.SB490,7,114(av) In determining prevailing wage rates under par. (am) or (ar), the 5department may not use data from projects that are subject to this section, s. 103.49 6or 103.50, or 40 USC 3142 unless the department determines that there is 7insufficient wage data in the area to determine those prevailing wage rates, in 8which case the department may use data from projects that are subject to this 9section, s. 103.49 or 103.50, or 40 USC 3142. In determining prevailing wage rates 10under par. (am) or (ar), the department may not use data from any construction 11work that is performed by a local governmental unit or a state agency.SB490,7,2012(bm) Any person may request a recalculation of any portion of an initial 13determination within 30 days after the initial determination date if the person 14submits evidence with the request showing that the prevailing wage rate for any 15given trade or occupation included in the initial determination does not represent 16the prevailing wage rate for that trade or occupation in the area. The evidence shall 17include wage rate information reflecting work performed by individuals working in 18the contested trade or occupation in the area during the current survey period. The 19department shall affirm or modify the initial determination within 15 days after 20the date on which the department receives the request for recalculation.SB490,8,1121(br) In addition to the recalculation under par. (bm), the local governmental 22unit that requested the determination under this subsection may request a review 23of any portion of a determination within 30 days after the date of issuance of the 1determination if the local governmental unit submits evidence with the request 2showing that the prevailing wage rate for any given trade or occupation included in 3the determination does not represent the prevailing wage rate for that trade or 4occupation in the city, village, or town in which the proposed project of public works 5is located. That evidence shall include wage rate information for the contested 6trade or occupation on at least 3 similar projects located in the city, village, or town 7where the proposed project of public works is located and on which some work has 8been performed during the current survey period and which were considered by the 9department in issuing its most recent compilation under par. (ar). The department 10shall affirm or modify the determination within 15 days after the date on which the 11department receives the request for review.SB490,9,212(dm) A local governmental unit that is subject to this section shall include a 13reference to the prevailing wage rates determined by the department and to the 14prevailing hours of labor in the notice published for the purpose of securing bids for 15the project of public works. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, if any 16contract or subcontract for a project of public works is entered into, the prevailing 17wage rates determined by the department and the prevailing hours of labor shall be 18physically incorporated into and made a part of the contract or subcontract. For a 19minor subcontract, as determined by the department, the department shall 20prescribe by rule the method of notifying the minor subcontractor of the prevailing 21wage rates and prevailing hours of labor applicable to the minor subcontract. The 22prevailing wage rates and prevailing hours of labor applicable to a contract or 1subcontract may not be changed during the time that the contract or subcontract is 2in force.SB490,9,43(e) No contractor, subcontractor, or contractor’s or subcontractor’s agent that 4is subject to this section may do any of the following:SB490,9,751. Pay an individual performing the work described in sub. (4) less than the 6prevailing wage rate in the same or most similar trade or occupation determined 7under this subsection.SB490,9,1282. Allow an individual performing the work described in sub. (4) to work a 9greater number of hours per day or per week than the prevailing hours of labor, 10unless the contractor, subcontractor, or contractor’s or subcontractor’s agent pays 11the individual for all hours worked in excess of the prevailing hours of labor at a 12rate of at least 1.5 times the individual’s hourly basic rate of pay. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb490 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb490 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB490 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB490 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB490: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting